Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Inspection for Brands and Ownership

Cross references. —

For definitions of terms used in this article, see §

11-20-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 3, 15 to 19, 23; 3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 16 to 30.

§ 11-20-201.
Designation of contract services to implement brand inspection laws;
bond required; bond of inspectors; interstate cooperative agreements.

The board may designate an agency or contract for services subject to rules and regulations of the board, to exercise the rights, powers and duties provided by law with respect to inspection of brands and ownership of the animals mentioned herein.

The agency, or the board may contract for inspectors as the board deems necessary to carry out specified duties. The board may contract for inspectors through an individual at-will contract. The board may contract to provide the inspector salary, mileage, per diem and other necessary reimbursable expenses, membership in the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan in accordance with W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV) and

9-3-207

, and the state retirement system in accordance with W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV) and

9-3-412

. The board shall be authorized to establish mileage rates without regard to the limitations provided in W.S.

9-3-103

. During the time that inspectors are acting within the scope of their duties on behalf or in service of the state in their official capacity, inspectors are covered by the provisions of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, and the state self-insurance program, W.S.

1-41-101

through

1-41-111

. It may assign inspectors inside or outside of this state as it deems appropriate. A blanket bond or individual bonds shall be executed to the state with good and sufficient surety in an amount determined by the board, conditioned for the full and faithful performance and discharge of the inspector’s duties. The bond shall be approved by and filed in the office of the board.

The board may enter into cooperative agreements wherever economically feasible with the proper authorities of other states for the enforcement and implementation of the Wyoming brand laws. Brand inspections performed in accordance with such a cooperative agreement is a Wyoming brand inspection within the meaning of the brand inspection laws of this state. For purposes of this subsection, the brand inspection need not be performed by a Wyoming brand inspector.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 22; 1953, ch. 70, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-371; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 21; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-240; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1979, ch. 21, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 1991, ch. 36, § 1; ch. 183, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2000, ch. 29, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to authority of inspector or sheriff to seize and kill animals to ascertain mark or brand, see §

11-20-301

.

As to sale of carcass of animal killed to ascertain ownership by sheriff or inspector, see §

11-20-302

.

As to duty of inspectors as to hides and carcasses generally, see §§

11-23-101

to

11-23-305

.

As to duties of inspectors relative to estrays generally, see §§

11-24-101

to

11-24-115

.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" twice in the second sentence of (b).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Cited

in

Peterson v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999); Estate of Harris v. Harris, 218 F.3d 1140,

2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 15704

(10th Cir. 2000).

§ 11-20-202.
Duties of board; enforcement of provisions.

Inspections for brands and ownership of livestock, wool, pelts, hides or carcasses shall be made by the board or its designated agency. The board shall prepare and provide all forms required for inspections and recording inspections for brands and ownership, and any substitutes or facsimiles are invalid. The agency of the board shall keep on file in its office copies of inspection certificates. The board shall make rules and regulations governing inspections for brands and ownership as necessary, consistent with the laws of Wyoming.

The board shall enforce the brand inspection provisions of this act. No agent of the board exercising ordinary care and precaution in performing his duties is liable for any damage or loss that may be incurred thereby. The immunity from liability provided by this section shall include liability for damages alleged to have been caused by an agent’s efforts to repair a fence.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-348; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 7; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-201

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 76, § 1, effective February 27, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

added the last sentence in (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 76, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 27, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-20-101(a)(vii).

§ 11-20-203.
Inspection of brands at time of delivery or removal; certificate
required; lack thereof; emergency movement of livestock.

Except as otherwise provided in this section or except as provided in W.S.

11-20-211

,

11-20-224

and

11-20-230

, it is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association to sell, change ownership or to remove or cause to be removed in any way from any county in Wyoming to any other state or country, any livestock unless each animal has been inspected for brands and ownership at the time of delivery or removal by an authorized Wyoming brand inspector and a proper certificate of inspection or clearance has been issued.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 191, § 2.

Except as otherwise provided in this section or except as provided in W.S.

11-20-211

,

11-20-217

,

11-20-224

and

11-20-230

, it is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation or association to remove or cause to be removed in any way from any county in Wyoming to any other county, any livestock unless each animal has been inspected for brands and ownership at the time of delivery or removal by an authorized Wyoming brand inspector and a proper certificate of inspection or clearance has been issued, except where the board has established brand inspection zones for each species of livestock. Brand inspection zones may encompass an area based on multiple contiguous counties or the entire state, as determined by the board. Brand inspection zones shall be reviewed and reauthorized annually by the board and shall be in effect for a calendar year.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a person, firm, partnership, corporation or association may move livestock to another county in this state in the case of an emergency situation declared or recognized by the board or director. If a livestock animal is moved under this subsection, the person moving the animal shall notify the board or an agent of the board not later than forty-eight (48) hours after the movement has occurred. Prior to moving the livestock back to the original location or to any other location, the person shall obtain an inspection of brands and ownership and the board shall not charge a fee for the inspection. If livestock will be moved across state lines in an emergency situation declared or recognized by the board or director under this subsection, the person, firm, partnership, corporation or association shall immediately contact the board and follow the direction of the board for inspection of brands and ownership. The board or director may declare an emergency situation under this subsection at any time it is required for public safety or the safety of livestock. If livestock is moved prior to declaration of an emergency situation by the board or director, the board or director may recognize the situation as an emergency situation after the fact if it determines that any movement of livestock was required for public safety or for the safety of livestock.

No inspection for brands and ownership is required if a change of ownership occurs solely due to:

A legal name change of a person, firm, partnership, corporation or association if the ownership of the firm, partnership, corporation or association remains unchanged and the brand is transferred to the new legal name;

The transfer of a brand from an individual or the individual and his spouse to a business entity if the individual or the individual and his spouse are owners of a one hundred percent (100%) interest in the business entity;

A conversion of a business entity as provided in W.S.

17-26-101

;

Marriage.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, §§ 1, 17; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-349, 11-355; Laws 1961, ch. 46, §§ 8, 11; 1967, ch. 97, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

11-23-202

,

11-23-205

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2001, ch. 26, § 1; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2007, ch. 105, § 1; 2013 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.

The 2006 amendment

inserted “11-20-211” and “11-20-230.”

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) deleted “county,” preceding “state or country”; and added (c).

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added (d) ((e) in the reconciled version).

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 107, § 1, in (a) and (c) substituted “otherwise” for “hereafter” following “Except as,” and added “in this section” following “provided;” in (b) added “Except as otherwise provided in this section” preceding “transporting livestock;” and added (d).

Laws 2013, ch. 107, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 27, 2013.

The third 2013 amendment, by ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (b), which read: “Transporting livestock across state lines without first having had such inspection and having obtained such certificates is prima facie evidence of intent to avoid inspection and to steal, take and carry away the animals and is punishable as provided in W.S.

6-3-402

.”

None of the amendments gave effect to the other and this section is set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

Brand inspections and impact on sales. —

Statute and
a section of the Wyoming Livestock Board Rules and Regulations do
not mandate a conclusion that failure to have a brand inspection performed
upon a sale or change of ownership voids the sale, or an A Form is
the only or superior proof of title to cattle, and the Wyoming Livestock
Board is in fact statutorily authorized to consider other documentation
as proof of ownership; plaintiffs' retention of the A Forms for the
disputed cattle did not definitively vest ownership in them, and in
fact defendants held title to the disputed cattle, and plaintiffs'
claims to the contrary failed. Gould v. Ochsner, 2015 WY 101, 354 P.3d 965,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2015).

Entry onto land by brand inspector consistent with statutory
authority. —

An involuntary bailment was created when the parents took their daughter to live elsewhere but kept her horse, and the parents, as involuntary bailees, had an absolute duty to return the property when the daughter terminated the bailment; consequently, the brand inspector's action in entering the parents' land to retrieve the daughter's horse for transfer to the daughter's agent was consistent with his statutory authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 11-20-203(a), 205(a), 214(a), and constituted neither criminal trespass nor larceny. Hoblyn v. Johnson, 2002 WY 152, 55 P.3d 1219,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. Nov. 5, 2002).

There was no Fourth Amendment violation because Wyoming brand inspection statutes, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

11-20-203

and

11-20-205

, authorize the brand inspector to inspect the cattle where they are to be moved from one county to another and the regulatory seizure, specifically authorized by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

11-24-101

and

11-24-102

, is designed to protect the urgent state interest of preventing trafficking in lost or stolen cattle, such that the brand inspector was not required to obtain a warrant. Stanko v. Mahar, 419 F.3d 1107,

2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 17323

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2005).

Applied

in

Mendicoa v. State, 771 P.2d 1240,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

Estate of Harris v. Harris, 218 F.3d 1140, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 15704 (10th Cir. 2000).

§ 11-20-204.
Inspector not to inspect his own livestock; penalty.

It is unlawful for any
inspector to issue a certificate of inspection covering livestock
owned by him or in which he has any financial interest, and any violation
of this provision is punishable as a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-240.

§ 11-20-205.
Procedures generally; estrays.

Except as otherwise provided, before selling, changing ownership or removing any livestock from any county of Wyoming, the person selling, changing ownership or intending to cause removal shall notify the inspector of the date of the intended removal and the time and place when and where the required inspection for brands and ownership can be made. The inspection shall be made within a reasonable time prior to shipment. The person in charge of the livestock shall hold the livestock at the place designated until the livestock have been inspected and an official certificate of inspection is issued. The person in charge shall render the inspecting officer such assistance as is practicable while the required inspection is being made.

Upon being notified of the intention of any person to sell, change ownership or remove from the county any livestock when a prior inspection is required by law, the inspector notified shall go to the place designated at the time agreed upon, and make an inspection for brands and ownership of the livestock.

The inspection shall only be done under conditions that allow the inspector, at the sole discretion of the inspector, to adequately view the livestock for the purpose of determining brands. The inspector shall list by classes the livestock, showing number of each class and all brands, together with the names of owners of the brands, if known. The inspector may require from the person in charge proof of ownership of the livestock to be removed from the county, by brand record, bill of sale or the affidavits of at least two (2) responsible citizens of the county who are not interested financially in the animals. If ownership of any of the livestock is not claimed by the person intending to remove them from the county, then written authorization from the owner for such removal is required.

Estrays, the ownership of which is unknown, shall not be removed from the county except by order of the inspector in accordance with W.S.

11-24-102

.

No inspection for brands and ownership is required if a change of ownership occurs solely due to:

A legal name change of a person, firm, partnership, corporation or association if the ownership of the person, firm, partnership, corporation or association remains unchanged;

The transfer of a brand from an individual or the individual and his spouse to a business entity if the individual or the individual and his spouse are owners of a one hundred percent (100%) interest in the business entity;

A conversion of a business entity as provided in W.S.

17-26-101

;

Marriage.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 15; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-366, 11-373; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 22; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-23-216, 11-23-241; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2013 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “selling, changing ownership or” in (a) and (b); substituted “only be done under conditions that allow the inspector, at the sole discretion of the inspector, to adequately view the livestock for the purpose of determining brands” for “be made by daylight in such manner as to enable the inspecting officer to make a thorough and efficient inspection” in (c).

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (e).

Board's Authority. —

Statute and
a section of the Wyoming Livestock Board Rules and Regulations do
not mandate a conclusion that failure to have a brand inspection performed
upon a sale or change of ownership voids the sale, or an A Form is
the only or superior proof of title to cattle, and the Wyoming Livestock
Board is in fact statutorily authorized to consider other documentation
as proof of ownership; plaintiffs' retention of the A Forms for the
disputed cattle did not definitively vest ownership in them, and in
fact defendants held title to the disputed cattle, and plaintiffs'
claims to the contrary failed. Gould v. Ochsner, 2015 WY 101, 354 P.3d 965,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2015).

Entry onto land by brand inspector consistent with statutory
authority. —

An involuntary bailment was created when the parents took their daughter to live elsewhere but kept her horse, and the parents, as involuntary bailees, had an absolute duty to return the property when the daughter terminated the bailment; consequently, the brand inspector's action in entering the parents' land to retrieve the daughter's horse for transfer to the daughter's agent was consistent with his statutory authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 11-20-203(a), 205(a), 214(a), and constituted neither criminal trespass nor larceny. Hoblyn v. Johnson, 2002 WY 152, 55 P.3d 1219,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. Nov. 5, 2002).

There was no Fourth Amendment violation because Wyoming brand inspection statutes, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

11-20-203

and

11-20-205

, authorize the brand inspector to inspect the cattle where they are to be moved from one county to another and the regulatory seizure, specifically authorized by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

11-24-101

and

11-24-102

, is designed to protect the urgent state interest of preventing trafficking in lost or stolen cattle, such that the brand inspector was not required to obtain a warrant. Stanko v. Mahar, 419 F.3d 1107,

2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 17323

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2005).

Cited

in

Estate of Harris v. Harris, 218 F.3d 1140, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 15704 (10th Cir. 2000).

§ 11-20-206.
Certificate
of inspection generally; distribution of copies; failure to exhibit;
justification to hold vehicle and livestock.

Any inspector, upon completing an inspection of livestock for brands and ownership, shall record the inspection upon a form furnished by the Wyoming livestock board. When completed and signed by the inspector and the owner of the livestock or the owner’s designee, the form is a certificate of inspection authorizing the removal from the county of the livestock listed. The inspector shall deliver a copy of the certificate to the person in charge of the livestock. If movement is to be by truck, a copy of the certificate shall be delivered by the person in charge of the animals to the driver or person in charge of the truck or trucks, and shall be kept in the latter’s possession until the livestock are delivered at the final destination as shown on the certificate of inspection, and shall be exhibited upon request to any person authorized to enforce the brand inspection laws of this state.

Failure or refusal by the driver of any vehicle to exhibit a certificate of inspection or a properly executed shipper’s certificate and agreement or permit listing the livestock being transported within the state, is justification for any authorized person to hold the vehicle and the livestock, at the carrier’s or the shipper’s expense, until the carrier establishes his right to transport the livestock. If the carrier cannot establish his right to transport the livestock within twelve (12) hours, the vehicle and livestock shall be impounded as provided by W.S.

11-20-228

, pending complete investigation and disposition as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 16; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-374, 11-380; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 23; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-23-242, 11-23-244; W.S. 1977, Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2007, ch. 105, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “the inspector and the owner of the livestock or the owner's designee” for “him” and deleted the third sentence.

§ 11-20-207.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982,
ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 26, related to misconduct in office. For present similar provisions, see §§

6-5-102

,

6-5-103

and

6-5-108

.

§ 11-20-208.
Proof of prior ownership; penalties for furnishing false proof.

When the proof of ownership inspection is used, inspectors shall require proof of ownership of livestock upon change of ownership as provided by W.S. 11-20-203(a) and an instrument evidencing such ownership shall be delivered by the shipper to the inspector who shall attach it to the form and return it to the agency.

The furnishing of false proof of prior ownership is probable cause for investigation of a felony offense being committed. All livestock involved shall be remanded to the custody of the Wyoming livestock board pending the outcome of the investigation and criminal charges, if any. Costs incurred for maintenance of the livestock involved shall be paid by the person who furnished false proof of ownership. Should the investigation show the only offense involved is furnishing false proof of ownership, the person furnishing such false proof shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) or more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-381, 11-382; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 26; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-23-245, 11-23-246; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 9, § 1.

§ 11-20-209.
When inspection not required.

No inspection for brands
and ownership is required for livestock originating in another state,
territory or country and being transported through Wyoming by common
carrier or contract carrier in interstate commerce, without leaving
the custody of the carrier.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-356; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-206

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-210.
When inspection not required; certain importations; compliance with
health and quarantine regulations required.

Subject to conditions
set forth in this section, no inspection for brands and ownership
is required of livestock being imported into Wyoming if the livestock
are transported or driven directly from point of entry into Wyoming
to a destination within Wyoming and the person in charge of, or having
custody of the livestock has in his possession written authority to
transport or drive the livestock from the state, territory or country
of origin to a destination in Wyoming and written evidence that all
health and quarantine regulations of Wyoming have been complied with.
Such written evidence shall be shown upon request to any officer authorized
to enforce the brand inspection laws.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-357; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-207

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-211.
When inspection not required; contiguous range.

No inspection for brands
and ownership is required for livestock being moved to their accustomed
range which is on both sides of but contiguous to any county or state
line, for the purpose of pasturing or feeding same. The word “contiguous”
means actually touching, bordering or abutting upon, and this section
shall not be construed to exempt from inspection livestock whose accustomed
range is near or in close proximity but not contiguous to a state
or county line.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 5; 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 7, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-358; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-208; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-212.
In-state range movement permits.

The board may issue an in-state range movement permit for the movement of livestock from a location in Wyoming to a noncontiguous location in another county provided the applicant and the ranch meet the requirements of this subsection and criteria established by rules of the board. The movement shall be for the purpose of pasturing, grazing, feeding the livestock, veterinary care, commercial lease or use or other board approved movement that is considered necessary for normal ranch management operating conditions. The movement shall not be for the purpose of changing ownership. A permit under this section may be issued only to bona fide owners or Wyoming resident lessees of qualified ranch lands headquartered within Wyoming or their authorized employees. As used in this section, a qualified ranch means a ranch that has been used for a period of time or purpose specified by the board and which use can be verified by brand inspection records. A permit may be denied by the board after a finding that the person applying for a permit has violated a brand inspection or animal health law, including a provision of this section, a board brand inspection or animal health rule or regulation or a board order.

The fee imposed by W.S.

11-20-402

shall be collected at the time of the issuance of the permit under this section. If a change of ownership occurs before the livestock is returned to the county of origin pursuant to a permit issued under this section, the owner shall notify a brand inspector for an inspection of the livestock and shall pay all fees imposed under W.S.

11-6-210

and

11-20-401

.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 2.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 78, § 1; 2007, ch. 105, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 204; 2013 ch. 13, §§
1, 2, effective February 12, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), deleted the second sentence, which pertained to delivery of inspection certificate if movement is to be by railroad.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (c), which read: “Each permit issued under this section shall be good for the calendar year in which it is issued unless sooner revoked for cause by the board. Permits shall be nontransferable. A permit may be suspended or revoked by the board after a finding that the person to whom the permit is granted has violated a brand inspection law, including a provision of this section or a board rule or regulation. If there are written complaints from three (3) or more affected parties to the board concerning the use of the permit, the board shall investigate the complaints and take appropriate action.”

The 2013 amendment,

in (a), added “or animal health,” substituted “board brand inspection or animal health rule or regulation or a board order” for “or a board rule or regulation,” and repealed former (e), relating to rules and regulations promulgated prior to July 1, 2005, and made a punctuation change.

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

Repeals and recreations. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2002, repealed and recreated former §

11-20-212

, relating to intrastate accustomed range permits for the movement of livestock from an accustomed range or ranch in one county to a noncontiguous accustomed range or ranch in another county, as present §

11-20-212

.

§ 11-20-213.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 105, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 98, § 2, related to the inspection of sheep to be conducted in state.

§ 11-20-214.
Brand inspector may inspect at his discretion; voluntary inspections.

A brand inspector may inspect livestock being transported, trailed, pastured or confined at his discretion, to determine ownership, without an inspection fee.

Any person may request an inspection for brands and ownership of livestock in his possession at any time. The inspection fee prescribed by W.S.

11-20-401

shall be collected by the brand inspector.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 98, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-476.2; W.S. 1977, § 11-27-202; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2.

Entry onto land by brand inspector consistent with statutory
authority. —

An involuntary bailment was created when the parents took their daughter to live elsewhere but kept her horse, and the parents, as involuntary bailees, had an absolute duty to return the property when the daughter terminated the bailment; consequently, the brand inspector's action in entering the parents' land to retrieve the daughter's horse for transfer to the daughter's agent was consistent with his statutory authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 11-20-203(a), 205(a), 214(a), and constituted neither criminal trespass nor larceny. Hoblyn v. Johnson, 2002 WY 152, 55 P.3d 1219,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. Nov. 5, 2002).

§ 11-20-215.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 105, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 7, related to the shipment by railroad; written permission of inspector required before moving; issuance; contents; copy to be filed with inspector.

§ 11-20-216.
Procurement, form, contents and validity of truck-fleet shipment
permit.

When a shipment of livestock
is to be made in more than one (1) truck and the entire shipment is
listed on one (1) certificate of inspection, or one (1) shipper’s
certificate and agreement, or on any single permit required by law,
the person in charge of the shipment shall obtain a truck-fleet shipment
permit. The board shall prepare the form and contents of the permit.
The permit is valid only for the shipment specified and on the date
or dates shown.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 11-361; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 14; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-211; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-217.
Certificates and agreements in lieu of inspection; generally; shipper's
demand for inspection; penalty.

Subject to conditions set forth in this section, no prior inspection for brands and ownership is required of horses, mules, cattle or sheep being or about to be transported to any open market where Wyoming brand inspection is maintained whether within or outside Wyoming.

In lieu of an official inspection for brands and ownership, the person proposing to remove livestock from any county of Wyoming to any such open market shall fill out and sign a certificate on a form approved by the board. The form shall include an agreement providing that the livestock listed on the certificate will not be diverted en route from the destination shown unless and until an inspection for brands and ownership has been made by an authorized Wyoming brand inspector, unless the diversion is to an open market where Wyoming brand inspection is maintained or where a brand inspection is made which substantially complies with the brand inspection laws of this state pursuant to an agreement entered into under W.S. 11-20-201(c). It shall further provide that in case of diversion of all or any part of the shipment the livestock diverted will be held at some convenient place, separate and apart from other livestock, until inspected, and the shipper will pay the necessary expenses incurred by the inspector and the legal inspection fees. The board shall establish a fee to be charged for use of the form authorized by this section. The fee for this form shall not exceed one dollar ($1.00) per head. The form authorized by this section shall not be issued until all fees required by W.S.

11-6-210

have been paid in full and may be collected at the time the form is issued by the issuing party. A blanket bond or individual bonds shall be executed to the state with good and sufficient surety in an amount determined by the board, conditioned for the full and faithful performance of any issuer of the forms and collecting of fees pursuant to this section.

Except on demand of the shipper, the inspector is not required to inspect any horses, mules, cattle or sheep, consigned directly to any open market where Wyoming brand inspection is maintained. If the shipper demands a prior inspection, the inspection shall be made and the legal inspection fee charged and collected. Inspection at point of origin does not exempt the shipment from inspection for brands and ownership, nor the shipper from payment of inspection fees at the open market destination.

The form authorized by this section may be denied, suspended or revoked by the board after proper hearing as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, and a finding that the person to whom the permit is granted has violated any of the brand inspection laws.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 9; 1951, ch. 14, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-362; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 15; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-212; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 1991, ch. 36, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1995, ch. 165, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 11-20-218.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 105, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 10, related to copies of certificates and agreements furnished by livestock board to railroad agents.

§ 11-20-219.
Certificates and agreements in lieu of inspection; filing and distribution
of copies.

After a certificate and agreement listing a shipment of horses, mules, cattle or sheep to be transported by common or contract carrier has been filled out, signed and witnessed, a copy shall accompany the shipment.

A copy of the certificate and agreement listing horses, mules, cattle or sheep to be transported by private carrier shall be retained by the owner or his agent until the animals have been delivered at the destination shown and shall then be delivered by him to the Wyoming brand inspector at the destination.

A copy of the certificate and agreement listing horses, mules, cattle or sheep being transported shall be shown upon request, to any person authorized to enforce the brand inspection laws.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 11-364; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 17; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-214; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1995, ch. 165, § 1.

§ 11-20-220.
Diverted shipments; notice thereof.

Should any shipment or
any part of a shipment of horses, mules, cattle or sheep listed on
a certificate and agreement consigned to an open market be diverted
en route from the destination shown, the railroad, trucking firm,
trucker or private carrier transporting the shipment shall notify
the Wyoming brand inspector at the original destination and the agency
that such diversion has been ordered and made. The notice shall be
sent within twenty-four (24) hours after diversion is ordered. If
the diversion is ordered and made before the shipment leaves Wyoming,
the required inspection for brands and ownership shall be made by
any Wyoming brand inspector. If the shipment has left Wyoming, the
inspection shall be made by a brand inspector having authority to
inspect Wyoming livestock outside the state.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 11-365; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 18; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-215; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1995, ch. 165, § 1.

§ 11-20-221.
Common carriers not to receive livestock for transportation without
certificate.

Except as otherwise provided,
it is unlawful for any railroad, trucker or other common or contract
carrier, or any person to receive for transportation or to transport
any horses, mules, cattle or sheep from any county in Wyoming to any
other county, state, territory or country, until furnished with an
official certificate of inspection, filled out and signed by an authorized
inspector, showing the horses, mules, cattle or sheep to be transported
have been inspected for brands and ownership.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 11-367; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 20; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-217; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1995, ch. 165, § 1.

§ 11-20-222.
Unbranded calves; inspection at request of stockman; fee.

All calves unbranded
or wearing unpealed brands shall be shown to the inspector at the
point of origin and at their mother’s side, upon written request of
a bona fide Wyoming stockman from the immediate area to the district
brand supervisor of that area, made at least five (5) days prior to
shipment, or upon request of an authorized brand inspector. When inspection
is requested, it shall be made immediately before loading and shipping
the calves. The seller or shipper shall report to the inspector the
name and address of the owner and shipper at destination of shipment,
mode of transportation and the name and address of the consignee.
The inspector shall record and file the same with the board or its
agency. If shipment is to a market where Wyoming brand inspection
is maintained, the usual fee shall be charged for sale ring inspection.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 60, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-370.2; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-220; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.